Tennessee, session 114, HB2520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-1602(c), is amended by
inserting the language ", in writing," after the language "shall notify".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2520
011888
- 1 -